test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-batsoj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - båtsoj: # N_CONTR_OJU (CGrade, vowel harmony)
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Nom: båtsoj
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Gen: buhtsu
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Acc: buhtsuv
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Ill: buhtsuj
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Ine: buhtsun
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Ela: [buhtsust, buhtsus]
#    båtsoj+N+Sg+Com: [buhtsujn, buhtsujna] #buhtsujna really ok?
    båtsoj+N+Sg+Com: buhtsujn
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Nom: buhtsu
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Gen: buhtsuj
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Acc: buhtsujt
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Ill: buhtsujda
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Ine: buhtsujn
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Ela: [buhtsujst, buhtsujs]
    båtsoj+N+Pl+Com: [buhtsuj, buhtsujgum]
    båtsoj+N+Ess: buhtsun
    båtsoj+N+Abe: buhtsudak
